Alaska, session 34, SB63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.33.810 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 44.33.810. Local Boundary Commission. There is in the Department of 06 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development a Local Boundary Commission. 07 The Local Boundary Commission consists of six [FIVE] members appointed by the 08 governor for overlapping six-year [FIVE-YEAR] terms. One member shall be 09 appointed from each of the four judicial districts described in AS 22.10.010, one 10 member shall be appointed from the unorganized borough, and one member shall 11 be appointed from the state at large. The members from each judicial district must 12 maintain a principal place of abode and be registered to vote in a precinct in that 13 district. The member from the unorganized borough must maintain a principal 14 place of abode and be registered to vote in a precinct in the unorganized 01 borough. The commission shall select a chair from among its members [THE 02 MEMBER APPOINTED FROM THE STATE AT LARGE IS THE CHAIR OF THE 03 COMMISSION]. 04 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 05 read: 06 TRANSITION. A member appointed to the Local Boundary Commission after the 07 effective date of this Act serves a six-year term as provided in AS 44.33.810, as amended by 08 sec. 1 of this Act. This Act does not affect the term of a member appointed to the Local 09 Boundary Commission before the effective date of this Act. 10 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect January 31, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.